California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 technician is competent to perform venipuncture or skin puncture, or to collect blood, before the technician’s first blood withdrawal, and on an annual basis thereafter. The supervisor is also required to determine, on a monthly basis, that the technician complies with appropriate venipuncture, skin puncture, and blood collection policies and procedures approved by the medical director and required by state regulations. The supervisor, or another designated licensed physician and surgeon, registered nurse, or person licensed under this chapter, shall be available for consultation with the technician, either in person or through telephonic or electronic means, at the time of blood withdrawal.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, a person who has been issued a certified phlebotomy technician certificate pursuant to this section may draw blood following policies and procedures approved by a physician and surgeon licensed
 under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000), appropriate to the location where the blood is being drawn and in accordance with state regulations. The blood collection shall be done at the request and in the presence of a peace officer for forensic purposes in a jail, law enforcement facility, or medical facility, with general supervision.

(B) As used in this paragraph, “general supervision” means that the supervisor of the technician is licensed under this code as a physician and surgeon, physician assistant, clinical laboratory bioanalyst, registered nurse, or clinical laboratory scientist, and reviews the competency of the technician before the technician may perform blood withdrawals without direct supervision, and on an annual basis thereafter. The supervisor is also required to review the work of the technician at least once a month to ensure compliance with venipuncture policies, procedures, and regulations. The supervisor, or another
 person licensed under this code as a physician and surgeon, physician assistant, clinical laboratory bioanalyst, registered nurse, or clinical laboratory scientist, shall be accessible to the location where the technician is working to provide onsite, telephone, or electronic consultation, within 30 minutes when needed.

(c) The department may adopt regulations providing for the issuance of a certificate to an unlicensed person employed by a clinical laboratory authorizing only the performance of skin punctures for test purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 2.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1246.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person may request, and any licensed clinical laboratory or public health laboratory may perform, the laboratory tests specified in this section. A registered clinical laboratory may perform the laboratory tests specified in this section if the test is subject to a certificate of waiver under CLIA and the laboratory has registered with the department under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1265. A program for nondiagnostic general health assessment that includes a laboratory test specified in this section shall comply with the provisions of Section 1244. The results from any test may be provided directly to the person requesting the test if the test is on or for his or her own body. These test results shall be provided in a manner that presents clear information and that identifies results indicating the need for referral to a physician and surgeon.

The tests that may be conducted pursuant to this section are: pregnancy, glucose level, cholesterol, occult blood, and any other test for which there is a test for a particular analyte approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for sale to the public without a prescription in the form of an over-the-counter test kit. A test approved only as an over-the-counter collection device may not be conducted pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 450, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1246.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a person may perform a total protein test using a digital refractometer in a licensed plasma collection center in this state, if the department, as part of its routine, fee-supported inspection of the licensed plasma collection center, including its review of personnel reports for licensed and unlicensed personnel and job descriptions of all center positions for a licensed plasma collection center, determines that all of the following conditions are met:

(1) (A) The person has earned a high school diploma or equivalent, as determined by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) pursuant to the federal Clinical Laboratory
 Improvement Amendments of 1988 (CLIA) (42 U.S.C. Sec. 263a).

(B) The person has training sufficient to demonstrate that the individual has the skills and abilities described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1269.

(2) (A) In addition to the education and training requirements specified in paragraph (1), the person has received five hours of training in the proper procedures to be employed when performing a total protein test using a digital refractometer, including evaluation of specimen acceptability and criteria for rejection of inadequate specimens, and the procedures for
 recording the test results pursuant to paragraph (9).

(B) Their training in the proper procedure to be employed when performing a total protein test using a digital refractometer has been certified by a moderate complexity laboratory technical consultant as specified in Section 1036.2 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, by a physician and surgeon licensed in this state, or by a licensed clinical laboratory director who is in charge of the licensed plasma collection center.

(C) The instructor documents, and the plasma collection center maintains the documentation of, the individual’s successful completion
 of training in the performance of the total protein test using a digital refractometer. This documentation shall be made available to the department upon request.

(3) The person performs the total protein test using a digital refractometer under the supervision of one of the following individuals:

(A) A moderate complexity laboratory technical consultant as specified in Section 1036.2 of Title 17 of the California
 Code of Regulations.

(B) A registered nurse licensed pursuant to Chapter 6 of Division 2.

(C) A physician or surgeon licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 of Division 2.

(D) A clinical laboratory director licensed pursuant to this chapter.

(E) A clinical laboratory scientist licensed pursuant to this chapter.

(4) The supervisor is physically onsite in the licensed plasma collection center and available for consultation during the entire time that the person is processing specimens and performing the test.

(5) The licensed plasma collection center’s supervising physician and surgeon or licensed clinical laboratory director provides a written job description for each employee who performs a total protein test using a digital refractometer that specifies the responsibilities and supervision requirements as specified in this section.

(6) The person performs the total protein test using a digital refractometer in accordance with both of the following:

(A) Standardized operating procedures required
 by the licensed plasma collection center’s license.

(B) Standardized procedures approved by the licensed plasma collection center’s supervising physician and surgeon or licensed clinical laboratory director for administration of the total protein test by the persons authorized to perform the total protein test pursuant to this section. These standardized procedures shall be made available to the department upon request.

(7) The person does not draw the blood sample required for the test using a procedure that requires a
 registration, certification, or license under state law unless they are properly registered, certified, or licensed to perform the procedure.

(8) The person’s competency in performing total protein tests using a digital refractometer is evaluated before testing on donors, and every six months thereafter, by the CLIA lab director or technical
 consultant by direct observation. A licensed plasma collection center shall maintain documentation of the competency evaluation, which shall be made available to the department upon request.

(9) The person accurately records the results of the predonation total protein test in a federal FDA 510k-approved blood establishment computer system
 (BECS).

(10) For each protein refractometer test system in use at the licensed plasma collection center, the center shall perform
 control procedures using the number and frequency specified by the manufacturer that meet the requirements of Section 493.1256 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations and this chapter.

(b) The digital refractometer used to perform a total protein test pursuant to this section shall meet all of the following criteria:

(1) Is used within 30 feet of the donor for whom the test is being conducted.

(2) Is used in accordance with the donor test management system, the quality control program, and the comprehensive quality assurance program established and maintained by the laboratory pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 1220, if applicable to the licensed plasma collection center under federal law.

(3) Performs total protein tests classified as waived or of moderate complexity under CLIA.

(4) Performs total protein tests using a digital refractometer on biological specimens that require manual blood collection, centrifugation to separate the blood cells from the plasma, pipetting the plasma from the cells, and application of the plasma into the refractometer.

(5) Provides total protein test results without calculation or discretionary intervention by the testing personnel.

(6) Performs total protein tests without the necessity for testing personnel to perform calibration or maintenance, except basic cleaning, resetting, and daily standardization pursuant to the manufacturer’s
 instructions.

(c) To assess the competency and performance of persons authorized to perform the total protein test pursuant to this section, a licensed plasma collection center utilizing this section shall make available to the department any information required by statute or regulation to be collected or maintained by the licensed plasma collection center, and the results of any testing required by statute or regulation to be performed by the licensed plasma collection center, related to assessing the competency and performance of persons using a digital refractometer, as determined by the department. Information obtained pursuant to this subdivision shall be confidential and is not a public record. The department may contract for collection and review of the information required by this subdivision. The contract shall be exempt from Part 2
 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and shall be exempt from review or approval by any division of the Department of General Services.

(d) Records of digital refractometer test results collected pursuant to paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) shall be maintained for three years and made available to the department upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 429, Sec. 1.   (AB 392)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Hemodialysis Training [1247. - 1247.9.]

1247.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Hemodialysis Technician Training Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 302, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1247.2.

For the purpose of this article, the following terms have the following meaning:

(a) “Immediate supervision” means supervision of dialysis treatment in the same room in which the dialysis treatment is being performed.

(b) “Department” means the State Department of Public Health.

(c) “Hemodialysis technician” means an unlicensed health care provider who is employed by a hemodialysis clinic or unit for the purpose of participating in the direct treatment of patients undergoing hemodialysis. A hemodialysis technician certified by the state as a person meeting the requirements of Section 1247.61 shall be referred to as a
 Certified Hemodialysis Technician (CHT).

(d) “Standardized test” means an examination certified by faculty of the University of California to validly and reliably measure the knowledge required to demonstrate competency in the areas being tested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 559, Sec. 2.   (SB 112)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1247.3.

The treatment of patients by a hemodialysis technician includes performing venipuncture and arterial puncture for the purpose of providing dialysis treatment for a patient. The treatment of patients includes the administration of local anesthetics, heparin, and sodium chloride solutions. The administration of these medications shall be pursuant to protocol established by the medical director of the hemodialysis clinic or unit and shall be under the immediate supervision of a licensed physician and surgeon or a licensed registered nurse. The administration of local anesthetics shall be limited to intradermal, subcutaneous, or topical administration. Hemodialysis technicians who treat patients in the home and are certified by the Board of Nephrology Examination for Nurses and Technicians are exempted from the requirements of immediate supervision until January 1, 1991.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 248, Sec. 2.   Effective July 31, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

1247.4.

The department may adopt regulations it deems necessary to implement this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 559, Sec. 3.   (SB 112)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1247.5.

A hemodialysis clinic or unit within a licensed clinic or hospital, as defined respectively in Sections 1204 and 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, may operate a hemodialysis training and testing program. A hemodialysis technician training program and competency test, provided under this section, or provided by an accredited college, an accredited university, or a private training program, shall be approved by the department, shall comply with the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 1247.4, and shall include training and testing in the administration of local anesthetics, heparin, and sodium chloride solutions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1247.6.

(a) Except during training under immediate supervision, and except as provided in Section 1247.62, no person shall provide services as a hemodialysis technician without being certified by the department as a Certified Hemodialysis Technician (CHT).

(b) This article does not apply to home dialysis patients, or patient helpers not employed by the licensed facility, who have undergone a home dialysis training program operated by a licensed clinic or hospital as defined in Sections 1204 and 1250 of the Health and Safety Code and have been certified by the medical director of the facility as being competent to perform home dialysis treatment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 559, Sec. 4.   (SB 112)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1247.61.

To be certified by the department as a Certified Hemodialysis Technician (CHT), a person shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) Have a high school diploma or equivalency, or have greater than four years of work experience in dialysis as of October 14, 2008.

(b) Have successfully completed a training program that is approved by the medical director and governing body of a hemodialysis clinic or unit, under the direction of a registered nurse. Following approval by the medical director and governing body, the training program shall be submitted to the department for approval. The training program shall be approved by the department prior to implementation. The training program shall focus on the operation of
 kidney dialysis equipment and machines, providing direct patient care, and communication and interpersonal skills, including patient sensitivity training and care of difficult patients. For purposes of this subdivision, a person “successfully completes a training program” if he or she completes all didactic portions of the program and demonstrates competency in the knowledge and skills provided by the program.

(1) The training program shall include all of the following subjects, at a minimum:

(A) Principles of dialysis.

(B) Care of patients with kidney failure, including interpersonal skills.

(C) Dialysis procedures and documentation, including initiation, proper cannulation techniques, monitoring, and termination of dialysis.

(D) Possible complications of dialysis.

(E) Water treatment and dialysate preparation.

(F) Infection control.

(G) Safety.

(H) Dialyzer reprocessing, if applicable.

(2) A community or corporate-based training program, or a training program offered by an educational institution, is acceptable if the program meets the requirements of this subdivision.

(3) A person employed as a hemodialysis technician by a hemodialysis clinic or unit for more than two years as of October 14, 2008, who does not have documentation of having successfully completed a training program
 meeting the requirements of this subdivision, shall be deemed to be in compliance with this subdivision by doing both of the following:

(A) Passing a written exam, offered by a hemodialysis clinic or unit, or a community or corporate-based training program that meets the requirements of this chapter, covering the subjects listed in paragraph (1).

(B) Passing a skills checklist through observation by a registered nurse of the skills listed in paragraph (1).

(c) Successfully accomplish either of the following:

(1) Pass a standardized test that is approved by the department and that covers the subjects listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) and in Section 1247.5. This test shall be administered in a proctored environment by an independent examiner. For
 purposes of this subdivision, independent examiners may include representatives appointed by End-Stage Renal Disease Network 17, End-Stage Renal Disease Network 18, the California Dialysis Council, or any private testing organization approved by the department for that purpose.

(2) Successfully pass an examination offered by a national, commercially available certification program for hemodialysis technicians which is approved for this purpose by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(d) (1) No later than July 1, 2019, the department shall require an applicant to provide either the individual taxpayer identification number or social security number for purposes of applying for or the renewal of a certificate issued under this section or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

(2) If
 the department utilizes a national examination to issue a certificate, and if a reciprocity agreement or comity exists between the State of California and the state requesting release of the individual taxpayer identification number or social security number, any deputy, agent, clerk, officer, or employee of the department may release an individual’s taxpayer identification number or social security number to an examination or certifying entity only for the purpose of verification of certification or examination status.

(3) The individual taxpayer identification number or the social security number shall serve to establish the identification of persons affected by state tax laws and for purposes of establishing compliance with subsection (a) of Section 666 of Title 42 of the United States Code, Section 60.15 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, Section 17520 of the Family Code, and Section 11105 of the Penal Code, and to that end,
 the information furnished pursuant to this section shall be used exclusively for those purposes.

(4) The department shall not do either of the following:

(A) Require an applicant to disclose citizenship status or immigration status for purposes of the application or renewal of a certificate.

(B) Deny certification to an applicant based solely on his or her citizenship status or immigration status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 838, Sec. 3.   (SB 695)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1247.63.

(a) Certification of a hemodialysis technician issued by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1247.6 shall be valid for four years.

(b) A certified hemodialysis technician applying for renewal of his or her certification shall submit proof that he or she has obtained 30 hours of in-service training or continuing education in dialysis care or general health care as a requirement for the renewal of his or her certification.

(c) An expired certification may be renewed at any time within two years after its expiration on the filing of an application for renewal and documentation of the required in-service
 education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 559, Sec. 7.   (SB 112)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1247.64.

A hemodialysis technician may obtain the in-service training or continuing education required by subdivision (b) of Section 1247.63 from one or more of the following sources:

(a) Health-related courses offered by accredited postsecondary institutions.

(b) Health-related courses offered by continuing education providers approved by the California Board of Registered Nursing.

(c) Health-related courses offered by recognized health associations if the department determines the courses to be acceptable.

(d) Health-related, employer-sponsored in-service
 training or continuing education programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 559, Sec. 8.   (SB 112)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1247.66.

(a) The department may deny, suspend, or revoke the certification of a hemodialysis technician if it finds that the hemodialysis technician is not in compliance with this article, or any regulations adopted by the department to administer this article.

(b) The department may deny, suspend, or revoke the certification of a hemodialysis technician for any of the following causes:

(1) Unprofessional conduct, which includes incompetence or gross negligence in carrying out his or her usual functions.

(2) Procuring a certificate by fraud, misrepresentation, or mistake.

(3) Making or giving any false statement or information in conjunction with the application for issuance or renewal of a certificate.

(4) Conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a hemodialysis technician in which event the record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence thereof.

(c) In addition to other acts constituting unprofessional conduct within the meaning of this article, all of the following constitute unprofessional conduct:

(1) Conviction for, or use of, any narcotic drug, as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, or any dangerous drug, as defined in Article 7 (commencing with Section 4211) of Chapter 9, or alcoholic beverages, to an extent or in a manner dangerous or injurious to the hemodialysis technician or any other person, or the public, to the extent that this use impairs the ability to conduct, with safety to the public, the practice of a hemodialysis technician.

(2) Abuse, whether verbal, physical, or mental, of a patient in any setting where health care is being rendered.

(d) Proceedings to deny, suspend, or revoke a certification under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 979, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1247.7.

An employee in training shall be classified as a hemodialysis technician trainee and shall be under the immediate supervision of a licensed physician and surgeon or licensed registered nurse whenever involved in the treatment of a patient, as described in Section 1247.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1297, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1247.8.

Each hemodialysis unit or clinic shall have information available for inspection by the department survey teams which verifies that the hemodialysis technicians employed at the unit or clinic meet the requirements of Section 1247.61.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 559, Sec. 9.   (SB 112)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1247.9.

No person or entity shall provide chronic dialysis services to patients in this state unless the services are provided under the direction of a chronic dialysis clinic, licensed pursuant to Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, or a general acute care hospital, licensed pursuant to Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 39, Sec. 2.   (SB 221)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Licensing [1260. - 1275.]

1260.

The department shall issue a clinical laboratory bioanalyst’s license to each person who is a lawful holder of a degree of master of arts, master of science, or an equivalent or higher degree as determined by the department with a major in chemical, physical, biological, or clinical laboratory sciences. This education shall have been obtained in one or more established and reputable institutions maintaining standards equivalent, as determined by the department, to those institutions accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges or an essentially equivalent accrediting agency, as determined by the department. The applicant also shall have a minimum of four years’ experience as a clinical laboratory scientist performing
 clinical laboratory work embracing the various fields of clinical laboratory activity in a clinical laboratory certified under CLIA. The quality and variety of this experience shall be satisfactory to the department and shall have been obtained within the six-year period immediately antecedent to admission to the examination. The applicant shall successfully pass a written examination and an oral examination conducted by the department or a committee designated by the department to conduct the examinations, indicating that the applicant is properly qualified. The department may issue a license without conducting a written examination to an applicant who has passed a written examination of a national accrediting board having requirements that are, in the determination of the department, equal to or greater than those required by this chapter and regulations adopted by the department. The department shall
 establish by regulation the required courses to be included in the college or university training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 341, Sec. 3.   (AB 940)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1260.1.

The department shall issue a histocompatibility laboratory director’s license to each person who meets the qualifications specified in Section 1209.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

1260.3.

(a) The department shall issue a medical laboratory technician license to each person who meets the following requirements:

(1) Has met the requirements of this chapter and any reasonable qualifications established by regulations of the department, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Lawfully holds an associate degree or an equivalent or higher degree in chemical, physical, biological, or clinical laboratory science, which includes a minimum of 36 semester units of physical or biological sciences.

(B) The completion of 60 semester (90 quarter) units from an accredited college or university, with 36 semester units in physical or biological sciences.

(C) Graduation from a medical laboratory technician training program accredited by the National Accrediting Agency for Clinical Laboratory Sciences or other recognized accrediting program approved by the department.

(D) Graduation from an advanced military medical laboratory specialist program approved by the department.

(2) Has applied for the license on forms provided by the department.

(3) Has paid a license fee established in regulations of the department in accordance with subdivision (q)
 of Section 1300.

(b) A licensed medical laboratory technician may perform clinical laboratory tests or examinations classified as waived or of moderate complexity under CLIA, but not high complexity, and may report the test results. However, a licensed medical laboratory technician shall not perform microscopic analysis or immunohematology procedures, except for blood smear reviews other than manual leukocyte differentials, microscopic urinalysis, and blood typing of moderate complexity such as
 automated ABO/Rh testing and antibody screen testing. The medical laboratory technician shall work under the supervision of a licensed physician and surgeon or a baccalaureate, masters, or doctoral level person licensed pursuant to this chapter. The supervision shall be required during the entire time a medical laboratory technician performs clinical laboratory tests or examinations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 235, Sec. 1.   (AB 2281)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1261.

(a) (1) The department shall issue a clinical laboratory scientist’s or a limited clinical laboratory scientist’s license to each person who is a lawful holder of a baccalaureate or an equivalent or higher degree, who has applied for the license on forms provided by the department and has met the requirements of this chapter and any reasonable qualifications established by regulations of the department. However, an exception to the degree requirement may be made by the department for the clinical laboratory scientist’s license only if the applicant for the license has completed a minimum of two years of experience as a licensed trainee or the equivalent thereof, as determined by the department, doing clinical laboratory work
 embracing the various fields of clinical laboratory activity in a clinical laboratory approved by the department. In addition, the applicant applying under this section must have 90 semester hours or equivalent quarter hours of university or college work or the equivalent thereof, as may be determined by the department, which shall have included at least 23 semester hours or equivalent quarter hours of science courses as specified by regulations of the department. Additional college or university work that includes courses in the fundamental sciences may be substituted for one of the two years of experience in the ratio of 30 semester hours or equivalent quarter hours for each year of experience. This exception shall not apply to the limited clinical laboratory scientist’s license. The department shall hold examinations to aid it in judging the qualifications of applicants. Licenses may be
 issued in any or all of the sciences applied in a clinical laboratory as determined by regulation established by the department. The department shall establish by regulation the college courses or majors to be included in the college or university training and the amount and kind of training or experience required. Examinations, training, or experience requirements for limited licenses shall cover only the science concerned. The department may identify by regulation the appropriate sciences and shall establish the minimum requirements for training and experience and required courses or major for each.

(2) Prior to the adoption of implementing regulations and notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 1261.5, the department shall issue a clinical reproductive biologist scientist license to every applicant for licensure who has applied for the
 license on forms provided by the department, who holds a baccalaureate or an equivalent or higher degree in a chemical, physical, or biological science or clinical laboratory science, who is certified as an andrology laboratory scientist, an embryology laboratory scientist, or a technical supervisor of andrology or embryology by a certifying board in the specialty of reproductive biology, clinical andrology, or clinical embryology approved by the department, and who meets the qualifications of training, education, and experience specified in Section 1261.5.

(3) Prior to the adoption of implementing regulations and notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 1261.5, the department shall issue a clinical laboratory geneticist scientist license to every applicant for licensure who has applied for the license on forms provided by the
 department, who holds a baccalaureate or an equivalent or higher degree in a chemical, physical, or biological science, clinical laboratory science, or a field related to genetics, who is certified in biochemical genetics or laboratory genetics and genomics by a certifying board in the specialty of genetics approved by the department, and who meets the qualifications of training, education, and experience specified in Section 1261.5.

(4) Experience as a clinical laboratory technician in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States may be considered equivalent to the experience as a trainee, if the experience is approved by the department. Each year of training and experience as a clinical laboratory technician in the armed forces shall be equivalent to 15 semester hours, which shall be credited to the minimum number of hours
 required to qualify for licensure as a trainee. The semester hours acquired in this manner shall not consist of the science courses required by the department under this section. The maximum number of hours granted shall not exceed 60 semester hours or its equivalent.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department shall establish an “MLT-to-CLS” pathway program by January 1, 2022, that would authorize a licensed MLT to apply their work experience and training from a department-approved MLT training program towards the completion of a CLS training program. The work experience and training may only be eligible for the pathway program upon approval by the department.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision:

(A) “CLS” means a clinical laboratory scientist.

(B) “MLT” means a medical laboratory technician.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 473, Sec. 7.   (SB 1267)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1261.5.

(a) The department may issue limited clinical laboratory scientist’s licenses in chemistry, microbiology, toxicology, histocompatibility, immunohematology, genetic molecular biology, cytogenetics, laboratory genetics, reproductive biology, or other areas of laboratory specialty or subspecialty when determined to be necessary by the department in order for licensure categories to keep abreast of changes in laboratory or scientific technology. Whenever the department determines that a new limited clinical laboratory scientist license category is necessary, it shall adopt regulations identifying the category and the areas of specialization included within the category.

(b) To qualify for admission to the examination for a special clinical laboratory scientist’s license, an applicant shall have both the following:

(1) Graduated from a college or university maintaining standards equivalent, as determined by the department, to those institutions accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges or an essentially equivalent accrediting agency with a baccalaureate or higher degree with a major appropriate to the field for which a license is being sought.

 (2) One year of full-time postgraduate training or experience in the various areas of analysis in the field for which a license is being sought in a laboratory that has a license issued under this chapter or which the department determines is equivalent thereto.

(c) Whenever a limited clinical laboratory scientist’s license is established for a specific area of specialization, the department may issue the license without examination to applicants who had met standards of education and training, defined by regulations,
 and to applicants certified by a board approved for that certification by the department, prior to the date of the adoption of implementing regulations.

(d) The department shall adopt regulations to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 473, Sec. 8.   (SB 1267)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1261.6.

The department may issue a limited clinical laboratory scientist’s license in cytogenetics to any person with a minimum of seven years of work experience in this state as a cytogenetic technologist who provides evidence of satisfactory performance on a written examination administered by the National Credentialing Agency for Laboratory Personnel on or before December 31, 1991, in the specialty of cytogenetics, and who meets the federal regulatory requirements for personnel performing high-complexity testing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 807, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1262.

No clinical laboratory scientist’s or limited clinical laboratory scientist’s license shall be issued by the department except after examination; provided, that a temporary clinical laboratory scientist’s license or a temporary limited clinical laboratory scientist’s license may be issued to an individual who fulfills the requirements for admission to the examination unless the individual has failed a previous examination for the license. The department may issue licenses without examination to applicants who have passed examinations of the national accrediting boards whose requirements are equal to or greater than those required by this chapter and regulations established by the department. The department may issue licenses without further examination to applicants who have passed examinations of another state whose laws and regulations are equal to or greater than those required by this chapter and regulations established by the department. The evaluation of national or state accrediting boards for the purposes of this chapter shall be carried out by the department with assistance of representatives from the licensed groups. This section shall not apply to persons who have passed an examination by a national board or another state examination prior to the establishment of requirements that are equal to or exceed those of this chapter or the regulations of the department. The department may, however, make exceptions if individuals are otherwise qualified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 319, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1262.5.
